Missouri, session 2026, SB1210.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 701, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 701.155, to read as
follows:
701.155. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Lithium Battery Recycling and Safety Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Battery", a medium-format rechargeable battery
with a rating between three hundred to two thousand watt-
hours, a lithium-ion rechargeable battery that uses lithium
ions to store energy, or a portable battery that can be
carried by hand and is used to charge or operate electronic
devices. A battery does not mean:
(a) A battery contained within a medical device;
(b) A battery that contains an electrolyte as a free
liquid;
(c) A lead-acid battery of any size;
(d) A battery that is a component of a motor vehicle
or intended for use exclusively in a motor vehicle; or
(e) A battery that is not intended or designed to be
removed from any product that is manufactured, distributed,
or sold in the state;

SB 1210 2
(2) "Battery recycling program" or "program", a
battery recycling program sponsored by the department where
the department provides or contracts for the transport,
processing, or recycling of batteries;
(3) "Collection site", any location, event, or other
department-approved collection service at which batteries
are accepted into the battery recycling program;
(4) "Department", the department of natural resources;
(5) "Director", the director of the department of
natural resources or the director's designee;
(6) "Manufacturer", a person or entity that designs,
creates, develops, and produces batteries. A manufacturer
does not mean a person or entity who sells batteries;
(7) "Recycler", a person or entity engaged in the
process of collecting elements from batteries, including,
but not limited to, heavy metals and chemicals by physical
or chemical recycling methods;
(8) "Representative organization", a nonprofit
organization established to implement the battery recycling
program.
3. Any manufacturer or recycler of batteries in the
state shall establish or join a representative
organization. The representative organization shall develop
and submit to the director for the director's approval a
plan for the establishment of a battery recycling program no
less than every five years. The plan shall:
(1) List contact information of each manufacturer or
recycler of batteries and battery brands covered by the
program;
(2) Describe the education and communication
strategies used to promote participation in the battery
recycling program;

SB 1210 3
(3) Describe the methods of funding the battery
recycling program in a manner that equitably distributes the
program's costs between the members of the representative
organization;
(4) Establish battery collection rate goals for every
year for the first three years after the implementation of
the program that are based on the estimated total weight of
batteries that have been sold in the state in the previous
three calendar years prior to the implementation of the
program;
(5) Identify proposed battery collection service
providers, including sorters, transporters, or processors to
be used by the program for the final disposition of
batteries;
(6) Establish a goal for the number and geographic
distribution of sites for the collection of batteries;
(7) Describe how the program will compensate service
providers for activities conducted under the program,
including, but not limited to, collection, transportation,
and final disposition of batteries;
(8) Describe the public outreach methods used to
increase the public awareness of the program; and
(9) List any other information the department deems
relevant.
4. The department shall enforce the representative
organization's compliance with the plan under subsection 2
of this section and may, by regulation or by using existing
regulations promulgated under sections 260.230, 260.240, and
260.249, establish enforcement procedures and penalties.
5. After the program is implemented, a manufacturer or
recycler shall not manufacture or recycle batteries in the

SB 1210 4
state unless the manufacturer or recycler participates in a
battery recycling program.
6. After the program is implemented, all batteries
shall only be disposed into receptacles at collection sites
approved by the program. A battery shall not be disposed
into any household waste or household recycle receptacle or
container.
7. Nothing in this section shall prevent or prohibit a
manufacturer or recycler from offering a fee-based,
household collection, or a mail back service for end-of-life
batteries independently of a battery recycling program under
this section, provided that such manufacturer's or
recycler's services under this subsection shall be
performed, and such manufacturer or recycler's facilities
are operated, in compliance with all applicable federal,
state, and local laws and regulations.
8. Any person may report violations of this section to
100 the department. If the department finds that a manufacturer
101 or recycler violated provisions of this section, the
102 department shall ask the attorney general to commence a
103 civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the
104 court finds that the manufacturer or recycler violated
105 provisions of this section, the court may grant injunctive
106 relief, damages, attorney fees, and any such other relief
107 the court finds appropriate.
108 9. By June 1, 2028, and by June first of each
109 following year, a representative organization shall submit
110 an annual report to the department covering the preceding
111 calendar year of the battery recycling program. The report
112 shall contain the following:
113 (1) An independent financial assessment of the program
114 by a third-party assessor, including a breakdown of the

SB 1210 5
115 program's expenses, including, but not limited to,
116 collection expenses, recycling expenses, and public outreach
117 expenses;
118 (2) Annual weight of batteries collected under the
119 program;
120 (3) The collection rate achieved under the program,
121 including a description of how the collection rate was
122 calculated;
123 (4) A list of all facilities used in the collection,
124 transportation, processing, or disposition of batteries;
125 (5) An estimated aggregate sales of batteries sold in
126 the state; and
127 (6) Any other information the department deems
128 relevant.
129 10. The report under subsection 9 of this section
130 shall be posted on the department's website and on the
131 website of the representative organization.
132 11. The department may promulgate rules to implement
133 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
134 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
135 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
136 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
137 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
138 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
139 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
140 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
141 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
142 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
143 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
144 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓